Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska57-1211
False oath; penalty.

Any person who shall intentionally make false oath to any return or report required by sections 57-1201 to 57-1214 shall be guilty of perjury and shall, upon conviction thereof, be punished as prescribed by section 28-915.

Laws 1983, LB 356, § 23.